Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-2310
Qualified public agencies; statement; contents; certified under oath.

Before the issuance of bonds pursuant to the Public Facilities Construction and Finance Act, the qualified public agencies participating in the bond measure shall make a written statement of all proceedings relative to the vote upon the issuance of such bonds and the notice of the election, the manner and time of giving notice, the question submitted, and the result of the canvass of the vote on the proposition pursuant to which it is proposed to issue such bonds, together with a full statement of the taxable valuation and the total bonded indebtedness of the qualified public agencies participating in the bond measure. Such statement shall be certified to under oath.

Laws 2018, LB1000, § 6.
April 18, 2018